Maine, session 132, LD1856.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 4 MRSA §1804, sub-§3, ¶O, as amended by PL 2023, c. 394, Pt. A, §2, is
further amended to read:
O. Establish a system to audit financial requests and payments that includes the
authority to recoup payments when necessary. The commission may summon persons
and subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance, require production of evidence,
administer oaths and examine any person under oath as part of an audit. Any summons
or subpoena may be served by registered mail with return receipt. Subpoenas issued
under this paragraph may be enforced by the Superior Court; and
Sec. 2. 4 MRSA §1804, sub-§3, ¶P, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 394, Pt. A, §3, is
amended to read:
P. Develop and maintain a registry of names, telephone numbers and other contact
information for attorneys who provide legal services to persons who are incarcerated.
The commission shall on a weekly basis provide these names, telephone numbers and
other contact information to all sheriffs' offices and to the Department of Corrections.
On the Monday following transmission of the information, the sheriffs' offices and the
Department of Corrections have constructive notice that communications to and from
these attorneys by residents of jails and correctional facilities are subject to the
attorney-client privilege. The attorneys' names, telephone numbers and other contact
information are confidential.; and
Sec. 3. 4 MRSA §1804, sub-§3, ¶Q is enacted to read:
Q. Develop a procedure for assisting persons who file post-judgment motions to seal
criminal history record information under Title 15, chapter 310-A.